Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-714
Federal Home Loan Bank; members authorized.

In addition to all other powers and investments authorized by law, every institution incorporated under the laws of this state and eligible for membership in a Federal Home Loan Bank may become a member of a Federal Home Loan Bank, as permitted by and in accordance with the Federal Home Loan Bank Act.

Laws 1937, c. 51, § 1, p. 214;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-601;

R.S.1943, § 8-714;

Laws 1991, LB 77, § 1.